src/fst/syllabification/hyphenation.xfscript
! =============================== !
!   Hyphenator for Tatar  !
! =============================== !

echo << defining Cns and Vow... >>

define Vow [ а | е | ә | ё | и | о | у | ы | э | ю | я | 
             А | Е | Ә | Ё | И | О | У | Ы | Э | Ю | Я ] ;

define Cns [ б | в | г | ғ | д | ж | з | й | к | л | м | н | ң | п | 
             р | с | т | ф | х | ц | ч | һ | ш | щ | ь | ъ | ҙ | ҡ | ҫ |
             Б | В | Г | Ғ | Д | Ж | З | Й | К | Л | М | Н | Ң | П | 
             Р | С | Т | Ф | Х | Ц | Ч | Һ | Ш | Щ | Ь | Ъ | Ҙ | Ҡ | Ҫ ] ;



define Sgm [ Cns | Vow ] ;
define Sign [ ь | Ь | ъ | Ъ ] ;
             
define JVow [ e | ё | ю | я | Е | Ё | Ю | Я ] ;           
define S [ с | С | ш | Ш ] ;

echo << and now the rules >>

define beforeSign  [..] -> %^  || Cns Sign _ Segm+ Vow ; ! Галь-кин
define beforeJV    [..] -> %^  || Vow Sgm* _ JVow ;      ! ка-я
define beforeCV    [..] -> %^  || Vow Sgm* _ Cns   Vow ; ! хэ-рэг-лэ
define CsCV        [..] -> %^  || Vow Cns  _ S Cns Vow ; ! Крон-штадт

echo <<Combining...>>

read regex [ 
    beforeSign 
.o. beforeJV 
.o. beforeCV 
.o. CsCV 
] ;
